Arkansas, session 2025, SB556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 8, Chapter 3, Subchapter 1 is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
8-3-104. Watershed discharge prohibition.
(a) A person or entity shall not discharge via surface discharge
wastewater into a watershed of any source of public drinking water at any
point upstream of where water is taken from the stream, river, lake, or other
body of water by a public water system.
(b) This section does not apply to discharge permitted under the
National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System stormwater discharge program
or the state stormwater discharge program.
(c) The Division of Environmental Quality shall enforce this section.




*JMB211*
03/21/2025 3:04:05 PM JMB211